ro-RO: Articole incluse în kitul cinelului: Crash + China; Crash + cinele pentru efecte; Crash + Hi-Hat; Crash + Ride; Crash + Splash; Pereche cinele Crash (pachet de 2); Pachet multi-Crash (3+ cinele Crash); Un singur cinel Crash; Altele
fr: Éléments compris dans le kit de cymbales: Crash et china; Crash et cymbales d’effets; Crash et charleston; Crash et ride; Crash et splash; Paire de cymbales crash (lot de 2); Ensemble multi-crash (3 crashs ou plus); Cymbale crash individuelle; Autre
sl-SI: Vključeni kosi v kompletu činel: Crash in china; Crash in efektne činele; Crash in hi-hat; Crash in ride; Crash in splash; Par crash činel; Komplet več crash činel (3+); Ena crash činela; Drugo
vi: Các vật dụng đi kèm trong bộ chũm chọe: Crash + China; Crash + chũm chọe hiệu ứng; Crash + hi-hat; Crash + ride; Crash + splash; Cặp chũm chọe crash (gói 2 chiếc); Gói nhiều crash (từ 3 chiếc trở lên); Chũm chọe crash đơn; Khác
en: Cymbal kit items included: Crash + china; Crash + effects cymbals; Crash + hi-hat; Crash + ride; Crash + splash; Crash cymbal pair (2-pack); Multi-crash pack (3+ crashes); Single crash cymbal; Other
ko: 심벌즈 키트 품목 포함: 크래시 + 차이나; 크래시 + 이펙트 심벌; 크래시 + 하이햇; 크래시 + 라이드; 크래시 + 스플래시; 크래시 심벌 쌍(2팩); 멀티 크래시 팩(크래시 3개 이상); 싱글 크래시 심벌; 기타
lt-LT: Į būgnų lėkščių rinkinį įeinantys elementai: „Crash“ + „China“; „Crash“ + efektų lėkštės; „Crash“ + „Hi-hat“; „Crash“ + „Ride“; „Crash“ + „Splash“; „Crash“ lėkščių pora (2 vnt.); Kelių „Crash“ lėkščių rinkinys (3+ „Crash“ lėkštės); Viena „Crash“ lėkštė; Kita
cs: Součásti sady činelů: Crash + china; Crash + efektové činely; Crash + hi-hat; Crash + ride; Crash + splash; Pár činelů crash (sada 2 ks); Sada více činelů crash (3 a více); Samostatný činel crash; Jiné
hu: Mellékelt cintányérkészlet-elemek: Beütő + kína; Beütő + effekt cintányérok; Beütő + lábcin; Beütő + kísérő; Beütő + splash; Beütő cintányér pár (2 db-os); Több beütős csomag (3+ beütő); Egy beütő cintányér; Egyéb
da: Artikler til bækkensæt medfølger: Crash + china; Crash + effekt-bækkener; Crash + hihat; Crash + ride; Crash + splash; Crash-bækken (par, 2-pak); Multi-crash-pakke (3+ crashes); Enkelt crash-bækken; Andet
bg-BG: Включени артикули в комплекта чинели: Краш + чайна; Краш + ефектни чинели; Краш + фус; Краш + райд; Краш + сплаш; Чифт чинели краш (опаковка от 2); Комплект от няколко краша (3+ краша); Единичен чинел краш; Други
sv: Ljussatsartiklar som ingår: Crash + china; Crash + effektcymbaler; Crash + hi-hat; Crash + ride; Crash + splash; Par av crashcymbaler (2-pack); Multicrash-paket (3+ crashcymbaler); Enkel crashcymbal; Annat
zh-TW: 包含銅鈸組品項: 碎音鈸 + 中國鈸; 碎音鈸 + 效果鈸; 碎音鈸 + 腳踏鈸; 碎音鈸 + 節奏鈸; 碎音鈸 + 點鈸; 碎音鈸組 (2 入); 多片碎音鈸組 (3 片以上); 單片碎音鈸; 其他
tr: Dahil edilen zil seti parçaları: Crash + china; Crash + efekt zilleri; Crash + hi-hat; Crash + ride; Crash + splash; Crash zil çifti (2'li paket); Çoklu crash paketi (3+ crash); Tek crash zil; Diğer
pt-BR: Itens incluídos no kit de címbalo: Crash + china; Crash + pratos de efeitos; Crash + chimbal; Crash + ride; Crash + splash; Par de pratos crash (pacote de 2); Pacote de múltiplos pratos crash (mais de 3); Um prato crash; Outros
fi: Symbaalisetin mukana tulevat tuotteet: Crash ja china; Crash ja efektisymbaalit; Crash ja hi-hat; Crash ja ride; Crash ja splash; Crash-symbaalipari (2 kpl); Usean crash-symbaalin paketti (yli 3 crashia); Yksittäinen crash-symbaali; Muu
de: Inbegriffene Becken-Set-Artikel: Crash + China; Crash + Effekt-Becken; Crash + Hi-Hat; Crash + Ride; Crash + Splash; Crash-Becken-Paar (2er-Pack); Multi-Crash-Pack (3+ Crashes); Einzelnes Crash-Becken; Sonstige
zh-CN: 包括镲片套装物品: 碎音镲 + 中国镲; 碎音镲 + 效果镲; 碎音镲 + 踩镲; 碎音镲 + 叮叮镲; 碎音镲 + 水镲; 碎音镲对镲（2 片装）; 多碎音镲套装（3 片以上）; 单片碎音镲; 其他
hr-HR: Artikli uključeni u komplet činela: Crash + china; Crash + efekt činele; Crash + hi-hat; Crash + ride; Crash + splash; Par crash činela (pakiranje od 2); Paket s više crash činela (3+ crash činela); Jedna crash činela; Ostalo
th: รายการฉาบที่รวมอยู่อยู่ในชุด: แครช + ไชน่า; แครช + เอฟเฟกต์; แครช + ไฮแฮท; แครช + ไรด์; แครช + สแปลช; คู่ฉาบแครช (แพ็ค 2 ใบ); แพ็คแครชหลายใบ (แครช 3 ใบขึ้นไป); ฉาบแครชใบเดี่ยว; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Itens incluídos no conjunto de pratos: Crash + china; Crash + pratos de efeitos; Crash + pratos de choques; Crash + ride; Crash + splash; Par de pratos crash (pack de 2); Pack de vários pratos crash (3 ou mais pratos crash); Prato crash individual; Outro
el: Περιλαμβάνονται αντικείμενα κιτ κυμβάλων: Crash + china; Crash + πιατίνια εφέ; Crash + hi-hat; Crash + ride; Crash + splash; Ζεύγος πιατινιών crash (πακέτο 2 τεμαχίων); Πακέτο πολλαπλών crash (3+ crash); Μονό πιατίνι crash; Άλλο
ja: シンバルキットアイテム付き: クラッシュ + チャイナ; クラッシュ + エフェクトシンバル; クラッシュ + ハイハット; クラッシュ + ライド; クラッシュ + スプラッシュ; クラッシュシンバルペア (2枚セット); マルチクラッシュパック (クラッシュ3枚以上); シングルクラッシュシンバル; その他
it: Articoli del kit di piatti inclusi: Crash + china; Crash + piatti per effetti; Crash + hi-hat; Crash + ride; Crash + splash; Coppia di piatti crash (confezione da 2); Set di crash multipli (più di 3 crash); Piatto crash singolo; Altro
ru: Состав комплекта тарелок: Крэш + чайна; Крэш + эффект-тарелки; Крэш + хай-хэт; Крэш + райд; Крэш + сплэш; Пара тарелок крэш (2 шт.); Набор крэшей (от 3 шт.); Одна тарелка крэш; Другое
sk-SK: Vrátane položiek sady činelov: Crash + china; Crash + efektové činely; Crash + hi-hat; Crash + ride; Crash + splash; Pár Crash činelov (balenie 2 ks); Súprava viacerých Crash činelov (3 a viac); Jeden Crash činel; Iné
nl: Inbegrepen bekkensetitems: Crash + china; Crash + effect-bekkens; Crash + hihat; Crash + ride; Crash + splash; Crash-bekkens paar (2-pack); Multi-crash-pack (3+ crashes); Enkel crash-bekken; Overig
es: Artículos del kit de platillos incluidos: Crash + china; Crash + platillos de efectos; Crash + hi-hat; Crash + ride; Crash + splash; Par de platillos crash (paquete de 2); Paquete multicrash (3 o más crashes); Platillo crash individual; Otro
nb: Inkluderte elementer i symbalsett: Crash + china; Crash + effekt-cymbaler; Crash + hi-hat; Crash + ride; Crash + splash; Crash-cymbalpar (2-pakning); Flerpakning med crash (3+ crash); Enkel crash-cymbal; Annet
pl: Dołączono elementy zestawu talerzy perkusyjnych: Crash + china; Crash + talerze efektowe; Crash + hi-hat; Crash + ride; Crash + splash; Para talerzy crash (dwupak); Zestaw wielu talerzy crash (3+); Pojedynczy talerz crash; Inne